Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7038.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-29-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-29 entitled "Fees" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
9-29-9. Fees of sheriffs, sergeants, and constables.
(a) The fees, including mileage, of deputy sheriffs, town sergeants, and constables, for
which a deposit to insure payment may be required, shall not exceed the following:
(1) For serving any writ of replevin, or out of state papers .................................. $100.00
(2) For serving all other writs, citations, or subpoenas ........................................... $70.00
(3)(2) For a writ copy of every one hundred words .................................................. $2.00
(4)(3) For every writ returned when the defendant cannot be found ...................... $15.00
(5)(4) For serving any writ of arrest or body attachment ...................................... $100.00
(b) For serving all other writs, citations, or subpoenas not specified in subsection (a) of this
section, the minimum fee required shall not be less than seventy dollars ($70.00).
(b)(c) The above fees shall be deposited as general revenue.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003555
========